Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-805
State agency directors; duties.

State agency directors shall be responsible for maintaining accurate documentation of the process used for selection of all contracts and for ensuring and documenting that services and personal property required under the contract are being performed or provided in compliance with the terms of the contract. Such documentation shall be kept with each contract.

Laws 2003, LB 626, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 73-505;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 5.